test/src/morphology/N-saabas14_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - saabas: # Noun (14) saabas 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     saabas+N+Sg+Nom: saabas
     saabas+N+Sg+Gen: saapa
     saabas+N+Sg+Par: saabast
     saabas+N+Sg+Ill: saapahe
     saabas+N+Pl+Gen: [saapidõ, saabastõ]
     saabas+N+Pl+Par: saapit
     saabas+N+Pl+Ill: [saapihe, saabastõhe]
     saabas+N+Pl+All: [saapilõ, saabastõlõ]
